Illinois, session 104th, HB745.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Trust and Payable on Death 5Accounts Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 625/1)  (from Ch. 17, par. 2131)7    Sec. 1. This Act may be cited as the the "Illinois Trust 8and Payable on Death Accounts Act".9(Source: P.A. 84-461.)